Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 16. Alaska Forest Products Research and Marketing Program.

Sec. 44.33.900.
Alaska forest products research and marketing program.

The Alaska Forest Products Research and Marketing Program is established in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The program is established to provide a statewide information clearinghouse and coordinator to gather and disseminate information relating to research and development, including technical, logistical, financing, marketing, and other relevant information regarding the manufacture of specific value-added wood products and the establishment of new high value-added manufacturing facilities in the state, and to assist in coordinating existing research and development efforts by state and federal agencies and other public and private entities.

The program coordinator shall identify unfilled needs and problems impeding the development of a high value-added wood products industry in the state, gather information and conduct analyses, and propose solutions by exploring successful models in other states and nations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 124 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.